New York, session 2025-2026, A8543.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 2 9 of section 11-104 of the energy law, as added by chapter 111 of the 3 laws of 2025, are amended and two new subparagraphs (iii) and (iv) are 4 added to read as follows: 5 (i) "electric vehicle ready infrastructure" shall mean all electrical 6 components, terminating in a receptacle or outlet, as necessary to 7 enable electric vehicle charging and support electric vehicle charging 8 stations; [and] 9 (ii) "electric vehicle charging station" shall mean all the equipment 10 necessary to deliver electricity from a source outside an electric vehi- 11 cle into one or more electric vehicles, as defined by the code coun- 12 cil[.]; 13 (iii) "power-based allocation method" shall mean a compliance approach 14 that allows electric vehicle charging infrastructure requirements to be 15 met based on the total kilowatt power capacity available for charging 16 electric vehicles, without mandating a specific number or type of charg- 17 ing stations; and 18 (iv) "charger-agnostic" shall mean a standard or method that does not 19 require the use of a specific type or brand of electric vehicle charger EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11280-03-6 A. 8543--A 2 1 and allows for the use of Level 1, Level 2, or DC fast chargers, depend- 2 ing on power availability and site conditions. 3 § 2. Subdivision 9 of section 11-104 of the energy law is amended by 4 adding a new paragraph (e) to read as follows: 5 (e) When adopting a new code after December thirty-first, two thousand 6 twenty-six, the department of state division of building standards and 7 codes shall promulgate rules and regulations establishing an optional, 8 charger-agnostic, power-based allocation method alternative to meet the 9 requirements of this subdivision. Such rules shall include, but not be 10 limited to: 11 (i) guidelines for calculating aggregate power capacity for electric 12 vehicle charging stations in parking lots; 13 (ii) standards ensuring equitable access to charging options for vari- 14 ous types of electric vehicles; 15 (iii) flexibility for property owners to select appropriate charging 16 types based on power levels; and 17 (iv) provisions to ensure compliance with all applicable safety and 18 accessibility requirements. 19 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.